Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-137
Checks; certification; requirements; effect.

No officer or employee of any bank shall certify any check drawn upon such bank unless the person, firm, or corporation drawing the check has on deposit with the bank at the time such check is certified an amount of credit, on the depositors' ledger of such bank, subject to the payment of such check, equal to the amount specified in such check; but the amount of such check shall not be recoverable from the payee or holder except in case of fraud. Whenever a check drawn upon any bank is certified by any officer or employee of such bank, the amount thereof shall be immediately charged against the account of the person, firm, or corporation drawing the same.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 39, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 318;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 39, p. 701;

C.S.1922, § 8019;

C.S.1929, § 8-158;

R.S.1943, § 8-163;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 37, p. 149.